New York, session 2025-2026, S4440.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 532 of the real property tax law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (m) to read as follows: 3 (m) All lands owned by the state which were previously used as the 4 Moriah shock incarceration correctional facility, including the improve- 5 ments erected thereon by the state, beginning once correctional oper- 6 ations have ceased at such facility, regardless of any state or 7 contracted personnel assigned to maintenance of relative facility 8 grounds or facility infrastructure including, but not limited to, build- 9 ings, heating systems, or communications technology, until the state 10 begins operations upon the land through a state agency or the land is 11 sold to a non-governmental entity; provided, however, that where such 12 lands are conveyed to a not-for-profit non-governmental entity, such 13 entity shall enter into a payment in lieu of taxes with Essex county and 14 the town of Moriah. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 16 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04884-01-5